North Carolina, session 2025, HB817.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 143C-5-2, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of fourteen million five
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($14,525,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be allocated in the form of grants to the following entities for the following
purposes:
(1) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to Hasten International, Inc., a nonprofit
organization, to be used for mobile medical clinic services.
(2) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to Camel City Track
Foundation, a nonprofit organization, to be used for an expansion of existing
facilities.
(3) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to the Samantha and Kyle Busch
Bundle of Joy Fund, a nonprofit organization, to be used to provide assistance
to low- and middle-income families struggling with the high cost of fertility
treatments.
(4) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) to the Piney Grove
Volunteer Fire and Rescue Department, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to
enhance unit transportation and firefighting capabilities.
(5) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to Winston-Salem
Speedway, LLC, for stadium improvements to attract large events to benefit
the regional economy.
(6) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to North Carolina Folk Festival, a
nonprofit organization, to be used for the annual Folk Fest in Greensboro.
(7) Five million three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($5,325,000) to
Historic Bethabara Park, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to be used for repairs,
replacements, and enhancements related to the historic site.
(8) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to Forsyth County for
the Cure Violence program to address gun violence.
(9) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) to Creative Corridors Coalition, a nonprofit
organization, to be used for design and construction of the Peter Oliver Public
Park, a park and open-air pavilion structure.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H817-v-1*